Maryland, session 2025, SB0782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
3–114.
(a) A committed person may be released under the provisions of this section and
§§ 3–115 through 3–122 of this title.
(b) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A committed person is eligible for discharge from commitment only if that
person would not be a danger, as a result of a mental disorder or an intellectual disability,
to self or to the person or property of others if discharged.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0782*

SENATE BILL 782
(2) A COMMITTED PERSON WHO WAS FOUND NOT CRIMINALLY
RESPONSIBLE FOR A CHARGE OF MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 2–201 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR MURDER IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 2–204
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR DISCHARGE FROM
COMMITMENT FOR AT LEAST 10 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE PERSON WAS
COMMITTED TO THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(c) A committed person is eligible for conditional release from commitment only
if that person would not be a danger, as a result of a mental disorder or an intellectual
disability, to self or to the person or property of others if released from confinement with
conditions imposed by the court.
(d) To be released, a committed person has the burden to establish by a
preponderance of the evidence eligibility for discharge or eligibility for conditional release.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any commitment to the Maryland Department of Health that occurred before
the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.